Rhode Island, session 2025, SB202.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly hereby finds that:
(1) The state faces a severe and continuing housing crisis. Many state residents are unable
to obtain or retain affordable housing.
(2) This crisis has profoundly negative effects on the state. It causes dislocation, which
frays the social ties that bind our neighborhoods and communities together. It forces vulnerable
residents to leave their home, the state, for new communities where they are strangers. And it
contributes to homelessness, which is itself a severe and continuing crisis in the state.
(3) The state's housing crisis is caused, in large part, by a shortage of affordable rental
housing. The creation and preservation of such housing is therefore of paramount public concern.
(4) One obstacle to the creation and preservation of affordable rental housing is rapid
turnover in the state's real estate market. Nonprofit organizations seeking to create and preserve
affordable housing may be willing and able to pay market prices to purchase residential buildings
for sale, but nevertheless find themselves unable to purchase such buildings before they leave the
market. Nonprofit organizations serving the broader public interest must often move more
deliberately and borrow purchase money from non-traditional lenders in such real estate
transactions than private entities concerned solely with profit.
(5) The purpose of this chapter (which may be referred to as the "community opportunity
to purchase act") is to enhance nonprofit organizations' ability to purchase multi-family residential
buildings, at market prices, within a reasonable period of time and to thereby promote the creation

and preservation of affordable rental housing.
SECTION 2. Title 34 of the General Laws entitled "PROPERTY" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.3
COMMUNITY OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE ACT
34-18.3-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Area median income" means the unadjusted area median income published by the U.S.
Department of Housing and Urban Development for the geographic area that includes the state.
(2) "Fee interest" means ownership of real property in fee simple absolute.
(3) "Multi-family residential building" or "building" means any privately-owned real
property in the state improved with five (5) or more residential rental units (whether or not the
property also includes non-residential uses).
(4) "Notice of special restrictions" means an agreement executed by a qualified nonprofit
and recorded against a multi-family residential building purchased by such qualified nonprofit
substantially in the form published by Rhode Island housing.
(5) "Purchase of a multi-family residential building," or "purchase," means to acquire any
interest that is transferred pursuant to the sale of a multi-family residential building.
(6) "Purchaser" means the individual, individuals, entity, or entities engaged or seeking to
engage, in the purchase of a multi-family residential building.
(7) "Qualified nonprofit housing development corporation" means a nonprofit corporation,
which has been approved under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) as a § 501(c)(3) corporation with the Internal
Revenue Service, and which is organized and operated with one of its principal purposes being to
provide housing for low- and moderate-income persons or a public housing authority.
(8) "Rhode Island housing" means the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation ("RIHMFC") created pursuant to chapter 55 of title 42.
(9) "Sale of a multi-family residential building," or "sale," means any of the following:
(i) The transfer, in exchange for money or any other thing of economic value, of a present
interest in the multi-family residential building, including beneficial use, where the value of the
present interest is the fee interest in the multi-family residential building, or substantially equal to
the value of that fee interest;
(ii) If an interest in the multi-family residential building is held by a trust, the transfer, in
exchange for money or any other thing of economic value, of a beneficial interest in the trust, where
the value of the beneficial interest in the trust is substantially equal to the value of the fee interest
LC000182 - Page 2 of 7

of the multi-family residential building; or
(iii) If an interest substantially equal to the value of the fee interest of the multi-family
residential building is held by any kind of corporate entity or partnership (including, but not limited
to, a corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership, or limited
liability partnership), and if that interest is substantially equal in value to the total value of assets
held by the corporate entity or partnership, the transfer in exchange for money or any other thing
of economic value, of a controlling interest in the corporate entity or partnership. For purposes of
this section, in any instance in which multiple entities (whether those entities are natural persons,
trusts, corporate entities, partnerships, or any other kind of entity, or any combination of different
kinds of entities) hold interests in a multi-family residential building, the transfer of multiple
interests by or in those entities shall be considered the transfer of a single interest, if the transfers
are made in connection with substantially the same transaction or set of transactions.
(iv) "Sale of a multi-family residential building," or "sale," does not include any of the
following:
(A) Any transfer made under a mortgage, deed of trust, or deed in lieu of foreclosure;
(B) Any transfer made in connection with any bankruptcy proceeding (including, but not
limited to, any transfer made by a bankruptcy trustee);
(C) Any transfer of an interest in real property held by the federal government, by the state
government, or by any special district created by state law (including, but not limited to, any
transfer of any such interest held because of a taxpayer's nonpayment of tax);
(D) Any transfer by devise or intestacy, or any other transfer made in connection with a
bona fide effort to pass an interest in real property to one's devisees or heirs (including, but not
limited to, such transfers made in connection with a living trust);
(E) Any transfer between or among spouses, domestic partners, siblings (including, but not
limited to, half-siblings, step-siblings, and adoptive siblings), parents (including, but not limited to,
step-parents and adoptive parents) or guardians and their children, grandparents and their
grandchildren, aunts or uncles and their nieces or nephews, great-aunts or great-uncles and their
grand-nieces or grand-nephews, or first or second cousins, or any combination thereof; or
(F) Any transfer of an interest in a multi-family residential building which is already
income restricted and shall remain income restricted upon transfer.
(10) "Sell," "sale," or "sold" means a transaction for the transfer of real estate from a seller
to a buyer, including, but not limited to, exchanges of real estate between the seller and buyer and
transactions involving the creation of a sales agreement.
(11) "Seller" means the individual, individuals, entity, or entities engaged, or seeking to
LC000182 - Page 3 of 7

engage, in the sale of a multi-family residential building.
34-18.3-2. Qualified nonprofits.
(a) Annual selection of qualified nonprofits. Rhode Island housing shall establish a process
which allows interested qualified nonprofits to submit for consideration, on an annual basis, their
credentials for participation in this program. Nonprofit organizations shall meet the following
criteria:
(1) The organization is a bona fide nonprofit as evidenced by the fact that it is exempt from
federal income tax under 26 USC § 501(c)(3);
(2) The organization has demonstrated a commitment to the provision of affordable
housing for low- and moderate-income residents, and to preventing the displacement of such
residents;
(3) The organization has demonstrated a commitment to community engagement as
evidenced by relationships with neighborhood-based organizations or tenant counseling
organizations;
(4) The organization has demonstrated the capacity (including, but not limited to, the legal
and financial capacity) to effectively acquire and manage residential real property at multiple
locations in the state; and
(5) A public housing authority having jurisdiction in a municipality in the State of Rhode
Island.
(b) Nonprofit organizations that Rhode Island housing certifies as having met these criteria
shall be known as "qualified nonprofits." An organization's certification as a qualified nonprofit
shall be valid for three (3) years. Rhode Island housing shall solicit new applications for qualified
nonprofit status at least once each calendar year, at which time existing qualified nonprofits shall
be eligible to apply for renewed certification as qualified nonprofits. In the absence of new
information raising doubts about whether the organization qualifies as a qualified nonprofit, an
existing qualified nonprofit's application for renewed certification as a qualified nonprofit shall be
routinely and swiftly granted.
34-18.3-3. Existence and publication of qualified nonprofits list.
Rhode Island housing shall publish on its website, and make available upon request, a list
of qualified nonprofits. In addition to such other information as Rhode Island housing may include,
this list shall include contact information for each qualified nonprofit. This contact information
shall include, but need not be limited to, a mailing address, an email address that the qualified
nonprofit monitors regularly, and a telephone number.
34-18.3-4. Priority for Rhode Island nonprofits.
LC000182 - Page 4 of 7

Qualified Rhode Island nonprofits shall be given priority over qualified out-of-state non-
profits.
34-18.3-5. General provisions - First right to purchase conferred.
(a) This chapter shall be construed to confer upon each qualified nonprofit a first right to
purchase any multi-family residential building which was constructed more than twenty (20) years
prior for sale in the state. This first right to purchase shall consist only of a right of first offer.
(1) Qualified nonprofits shall have the right of first offer for a period of not more than sixty
(60) days; or
(2) If the qualified nonprofit elects to extend the right of first offer to a ninety (90) day
period, it shall make a payment equal to one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the asking price of the
multi-family residential building, which shall be fully creditable should the nonprofit proceed with
purchase, and non-refundable if they do not.
(b) Any person or entity holding property subject to this chapter shall be limited to an
asking price no more than twenty percent (20%) above fair market value as determined by a
licensed appraiser or realtor.
(c) Upon receiving an offer from a qualified nonprofit, the seller shall have no more than
ten (10) days to respond to the offer.
(d) Confidential information protected. Any information obtained from a seller by a
qualified nonprofit under this chapter including, but not limited to, disclosures made and terms and
conditions of an offer of sale made shall be kept confidential to the maximum extent permitted by
law, except that a qualified nonprofits may, if otherwise permitted by law, share such information
with other qualified nonprofits to facilitate qualified nonprofit exercise of the rights conferred by
this chapter. Nothing in this chapter permits or requires the disclosure of information where such
disclosure is otherwise prohibited by law.
34-18.3-6. State owned buildings.
When any state-owned property, either land or buildings, is to be sold, the department of
housing shall be given the right of first offer lasting sixty (60) days to enter into an agreement to
purchase it at the appraised value. The municipality where the property is located shall be given
the right of second offer (lasting another sixty (60) days) to purchase, before the property goes on
the open market.
34-18.3-7. Preexisting rights unaffected.
This chapter shall not be construed to impair any contract, or affect any property interest
held by anyone other than the seller of a multi-family residential building (including, but not limited
to, any interest held under a mortgage, deed of trust, or other security interest; any option to
LC000182 - Page 5 of 7

purchase: or any right of first offer or right of first refusal), in existence before the effective date of
this chapter.
34-18.3-8. Enforcement - Seller declaration and certification.
(a) Every seller of a multi-family residential building in any city or town shall, within
fifteen (15) days of the sale of that building, submit to Rhode Island housing a signed declaration,
under penalty of perjury, affirming that the sale of that building substantially complied with the
requirements of this chapter. Each such declaration shall include the address of the relevant building
and Rhode Island housing shall publish all such addresses on its website at least once per week.
(b) Failure to file the declaration required by this section shall be an infraction punishable
by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000182
========
LC000182 - Page 6 of 7